Utah statutes.
75-5a-115.   Use of custodial property.

(1)  A custodian may deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor's benefit so much of the custodial property as the custodian considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor, without court order and without regard to:

(a)  the duty or ability of the custodian personally or of any other person to support the minor; or

(b)  any other income or property of the minor which may be applicable or available for that purpose.

(2)  On petition of an interested person, or the minor if the minor is 14 years of age or older, the court may order the custodian to deliver or pay to the minor or expend for the minor's benefit so much of the custodial property as the court considers advisable for the use and benefit of the minor.

(3)  A delivery, payment, or expenditure under this section is in addition to, not in substitution for, and does not affect any obligation of a person to support the minor.



Enacted by Chapter 272, 1990 General Session

